Wisconsin, session 2025, AB242.
do enact as follows:AB242,11Section 1. 941.40 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB242,2,122941.40 (1) Except as provided under sub. (4), any person having the right so to 3do who intentionally removes or changes any building or other structure or any 4timber, standing or fallen, to which any telegraph, telecommunications, video 5service, broadband service, electric light, or electric power lines or wires are in any 6manner attached, or causes the same to be done, and consequently destroys, 7disturbs, or injures the wires, poles, or other property of any telegraph, 8telecommunications, video service, broadband service, electric light, or electric 9power company, including a cooperative association organized under ch. 185, 10transacting business in this state, without first giving the company, at its office 11nearest the place of injury, at least 24 hours’ notice thereof, is guilty of a Class B 12misdemeanor.AB242,213Section 2. 941.40 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB242,3,614941.40 (2) Any person who intentionally breaks down, interrupts, or removes 1any telegraph, telecommunications, video service, broadband service, electric light, 2or electric power line or wire including grounds or who destroys, disturbs, interferes 3with, or injures the wires, poles, or other property of any telegraph, 4telecommunications, video service, broadband service, electric light, or electric 5power company, including a cooperative association organized under ch. 185, is 6guilty of a Class B misdemeanor I felony.AB242,37Section 3. 941.40 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB242,3,138941.40 (3) Any person who, for any purpose, intentionally makes or causes to 9be made a physical electrical connection with any wire, cable, conductor, ground, 10equipment, facility, or other property of any telegraph, telecommunications, video 11service, broadband service, electric light, or electric power company, including a 12cooperative association organized under ch. 185, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor 13I felony.AB242,414Section 4. 941.40 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB242,3,1915941.40 (4) (b) Subsections (2) and (3) do not apply to a person who acts with 16the permission of the telegraph, telecommunications, video service, broadband 17service, electric light, or electric power company, including a cooperative association 18organized under ch. 185, that owns the wire, pole, cable, conductor, ground, 19equipment, facility, or other property.AB242,3,2020